apertium-myv-fin.myv.lexc
LEXICON _КУДО-Attributes2
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>сь _ОШ-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_dat%>%<def%>:%>нтень Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>%<indef%>:%>тЬ2 _КИТ-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3 _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>:%>нь _КАЛ-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_prl%>%<def%>:%>Г2а%>нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_abe%>%<def%>:%>втО1мО1%>нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_abl%>%<def%>:%>дО1%>нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_tra%>%<def%>:%>кс%>О1нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_ine%>%<def%>:%>сО1%>нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_ela%>%<def%>:%>стО1%>нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_cmp%>%<def%>:%>шка%>нть Ks ;
 Attributes2_PL ;

LEXICON _ОШ-Attributes2
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_nom%>%<def%>:%>О1сь _ОШ-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>О1нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_dat%>%<def%>:%>О1нтень Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<cx_gen%>%<indef%>:%>О1нь _КАЛ-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_tra%>%<def%>:%>О1кс%>О1нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_ine%>%<def%>:%>О1сО1%>нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_ela%>%<def%>:%>О1стО1%>нть Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<sg%>%<cx_cmp%>%<def%>:%>О1шка%>нть Ks ;
 Attributes2_PL ;

LEXICON Attributes2_PL
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_abl%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>де Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_gen%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>нь Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_dat%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>нень Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_ill%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>с Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_prl%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>ва _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_abe%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>втеме _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_tra%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>кс Ks ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_ine%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>сэ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_ela%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>стэ _КУДО-Tenses1 ;
%<der_mwn%>%<n%>%<pl%>%<cx_cmp%>%<def%>:%>тнЕ3%>шка _КУДО-Tenses1 ;




LEXICON vese-QNT
%<pron%>: _КУДО-Misc_Pronouns_Sg ;
%<pron%>: Misc_Pronouns_Pl ;
%<dep%>: WORD-END ;

!! MISC
!LEXICON verbs
! verbs-iv ;
! verbs-tv ;

! Compounding

LEXICON R
#;
%- Nouns ;

LEXICON BAHUV_КАЛ
%<bahuvrihi%>: A_КАЛ ;

LEXICON BAHUV_ПАНГО
%<bahuvrihi%>: A_ПАНГО ;

LEXICON BAHUV_КУДО
%<bahuvrihi%>: A_КУДО ;


! ============ !
! Interj lexica !
! ============ !

LEXICON INTERJ_
%<interj%>: K ;

LEXICON Interj-Imp
%<interj%>%<imprt%>%<scsg2%>: ImpK ;
%<interj%>%<imprt%>%<scpl2%>:%>дО1 ImpK ;

LEXICON FORMULAIC_
%<interj%>%<formulaic%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON VOCATIVE_
%<interj%>%<voc%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON malaso-SPAT
!! malaso:mala
%<adv%>%<cx_ela%>:%>стО1 _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<adv%>%<cx_ill%>:%>с K ;
%<adv%>%<cx_ine%>:%>сО1 _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<adv%>%<cx_prl%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<adv%>%<cx_lat%>:%>в _КУДО-Conjugation ;

LEXICON ushoso-SPAT
%<spat%>%<cx_ela%>:%>стО1 _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<spat%>%<cx_ill%>:%>с K ;
%<spat%>%<cx_ine%>:%>сО1 _КУДО-Conjugation ;
%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-Conjugation ;




! ==================================== !
! Lexica called End, whatever they are !
! ==================================== !


LEXICON CC
%<cc%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON CS
%<cs%>: WORD-END ;


!LEXICON EndConj
!%<cc%>: WORD-END ;

!!Let's remember that Particle is merely an expression of form
!LEXICON PCLE
!а%<pcle%>%<neg%>:а WORD-END ;
!аволь%<pcle%>%<neg%>%<emphatic%>:аволь WORD-END ;
!ай%<pcle%>%<neg%>%<emphatic%>:ай N_КАЛ ;
!апак%<pcle%>%<neg%>:апак _ЛАК-Tenses-Obl ;
!седе%<pcle%>%<cx_cmp%>:седе WORD-END ;
!сех%<pcle%>%<superl%>:сех WORD-END ;
!сех%<pcle%>%<superl%>%<cx_abl%>:сехте WORD-END ; ! This is a comparative construction
!уш%<pcle%>%<intensifier%>:уш WORD-END ;

LEXICON PCLE-COMPAR-STND
%<pcle%>%<cx_cmp%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON PCLE-EPIST
%<pcle%>%<epist%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON PCLE-NEG-CONTRAST
%<pcle%>%<neg%>%<intensive%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON PCLE-NEG
%<pcle%>%<neg%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON PCLE-SUPERL
%<pcle%>%<superl%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON PCLE_
%<pcle%>: WORD-END ;


!LEXICON EndPart
!%<pcle%>: WORD-END ;

!LEXICON EndInterj
!%<interj%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON Interj
%<interj%>: WORD-END ;

LEXICON N-Voc-Px1Sg
%<n%>%<pxsg1%>%<interj%>%<voc%>: WORD-END ;


! List of spurious lexica
! These should be fixed.


! This lexicon would allow a loop whereby any full form
! could be treated as a noun
! E.G. мезеяк # 'anything'
! E.G. мезеяк+ ось # 'This _anything_ you are talking about'
!LEXICON Encapsulate


!LEXICON ADV-SUPERL
!%<adv%>%<superl%>: WORD-END ;



!!!
!formerly Spatials_4cx
LEXICON alo-Spat
 alo-SPAT-NoArg ;
! alo-SPAT-1Arg ; >PO_КАЛ-LOC

LEXICON alo-SPAT-NoArg
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_loc%>%<der_dem%>:%>це _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_loc%>%<der_dem%>:%>се _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<der_tra%>:%>кс N_ОШ ;
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_lat%>:%>%^О2в K ;
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_abl%>:%>дО1 K ;
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_loc%>:%>О1 K ;
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>:%>Г2а K ;
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_loc%>%<indef%>%<der_mwn%>:%>О1 _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ; 
%<adv%>%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>%<indef%>%<der_mwn%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;

LEXICON alo-SPAT-AdvN
 alo-SPAT-NoArg ;
 N_КАЛ ;
%<n%>%<cx_loc%>:%>О1 K ;

LEXICON alo-SPAT-PoN
! alo-SPAT-1Arg ; >PO_КАЛ-LOC
 N_КАЛ ;
%<n%>%<cx_loc%>:%>О1 K ;

LEXICON kovolo-Spat
%<interr%>%<spat%>%<cx_lat%>%<indef%>:%>%^О2в K ;
%<interr%>%<spat%>%<cx_abl%>%<indef%>:%>дО1 _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
%<interr%>%<spat%>%<cx_loc%>%<indef%>%<der_mwn%>:%>О1 _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ; 
%<interr%>%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>%<indef%>%<der_mwn%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
%<interr%>%<spat%>%<cx_abl%>:%>дО1 K ; !_КУДО-Indef--Poss ;
%<interr%>%<spat%>%<cx_loc%>:%>О1 K ; !_КУДО-Indef--Poss ; 
%<interr%>%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>:%>Г2а K ; !_КУДО-Indef--Poss ;

%<rel%>%<spat%>%<cx_lat%>%<indef%>:%>%^О2в K ;
%<rel%>%<spat%>%<cx_abl%>%<indef%>:%>дО1 _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
%<rel%>%<spat%>%<cx_loc%>%<indef%>%<der_mwn%>:%>О1 _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ; 
%<rel%>%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>%<indef%>%<der_mwn%>:%>Г2а _КУДО-N2-Def-Declension ;
%<rel%>%<spat%>%<cx_abl%>:%>дО1 K ; !_КУДО-Indef--Poss ;
%<rel%>%<spat%>%<cx_loc%>:%>О1 K ; !_КУДО-Indef--Poss ; 
%<rel%>%<spat%>%<cx_prl%>:%>Г2а K ; !_КУДО-Indef--Poss ;



LEXICON Mezty
%<assoc%>%<pl%>%<cx_nom%>:%>мезть K ;
%<assoc%>%<cx_dat%>:%>мезнень K ;
%<assoc%>%<cx_gen%>:%>мезень K ;
%<assoc%>%<cx_abl%>:%>мезде K ;
%<assoc%>%<cx_abe%>:%>мезевтеме K ;
!%<assoc%>:%>мезть K


 
LEXICON _ОШ-Indef-DefSg-Poss
 _ОШ--DefSg- ;
 _ОШ-Indef--Poss ;

LEXICON _ОШ--DefSg-
%<sg%>%<def%>:%>%^О2нть K ;

LEXICON _ОШ-Indef--Poss
%<indef%>: _ОШ-Tenses-Obl ;
%<pxsg1%>:%>%^О2нЬ2 _КАЛ-Tenses-Obl ;
%<pxsg2%>:%>%^О2тЬ2 _КИТ-Tenses-Obl ;
%<pxsg3%>:%>%^О2нзО1 _КУДО-Tenses-Obl ;
%<pxpl1%>:%>%^О2нО1к _ЛАК-Tenses-Obl ;
%<pxpl2%>:%>%^О2нк _ЛАК-Tenses-Obl ;
%<pxpl3%>:%>%^О2ст _КИТ-Tenses-Obl ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Indef-DefSg-Poss
 _КУДО--DefSg- ;
 K ; !_КУДО-Indef--Poss ;
 OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;

LEXICON _КУДО--DefSg-
%<sg%>%<def%>:%>%^О2нть K ;

LEXICON _КУДО-Indef--Poss
%<indef%>: _КУДО-Tenses-Obl ;
 OBL-PX4-END-FOC ;




! TODO: Integrate this in xml-files in working…

!LEXICON SUBSTANDARDS 
!коръя%<use_sub%>:корья Noun1 ;




LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SUB
%<use_sub%>: PROP_КУДО ;

LEXICON PROP_КУДО_SH
%<use_short%>: PROP_КУДО ;


!! VERBS

LEXICON V_ !! no stem type has been determined
%<tyä%>%<v%>: # ;

!! OBJECT FLAGS AND %<v%>%<tv%> tags


LEXICON TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll ;
LEXICON TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_ЛЕДЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_КАДОМС ;

! This should not occur
!LEXICON TV_САЕВЕМС-ObjAll
! %<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_САЕВЕМС ;


LEXICON TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_НЕВТЕМС ;

LEXICON TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll_sub
%<use_sub%>: TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll ;

LEXICON TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll
%<v%>%<tv%>@P.CONJ.ObjAll@:00@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V_САВТОМС ;

LEXICON Adverbs
коволо:ковол kovolo-Spat  "" ;
авасоло:а% васол alo-Spat  "" ;
авасоло:авасол alo-Spat  "" ;
аксяло:аксял alo-SPAT-AdvN  "" ;
ало:ал alo-Spat  "" ;
бокасо:бока malaso-SPAT  "" ;
вальмало:вальмал alo-Spat  "" ;
васоло:васол alo-SPAT-NoArg  "" ;
венеле:венель alo-SPAT-NoArg  "" ;
вепеле:вепель alo-SPAT-NoArg  "" ;
вере:верь alo-SPAT-NoArg  "" ;
кавалало:кавалал alo-Spat  "" ;
кудыкеле:кудыкель alo-Spat  "" ;
куншкасо:куншка malaso-SPAT  "" ;
латало:латал alo-SPAT-AdvN  "" ;
маласо:мала malaso-SPAT  "" ;
масторо:мастор alo-SPAT-PoN  "" ;
пеле:пель alo-SPAT-PoN  "" ;
пертьпеле:пертьпель alo-Spat  "ympärillä" ;
пряло:прял alo-Spat  "" ;
птруав:птруа ushoso-SPAT  "" ;
товоло:товол alo-SPAT-NoArg  "" ;
томбале:томбаль alo-Spat  "" ;
удало:удал alo-Spat  "" ;
ушосо:ушо ushoso-SPAT  "" ;
чипеле:чипель alo-SPAT-NoArg  "" ;
чиресэ:чире malaso-SPAT  "" ;
LEXICON Verbs
кирксемс:кирксемс V_  "" ;
кутякснемс:кутякснемс V_  "" ;
либор-либордомс:либор-либордомс V_  "" ;
маншетемс:маншетемс V_  "" ;
нерькетавомс:нерькетавомс V_  "" ;
ношкадомс:ношкадомс V_  "" ;
панцтамс:панцтамс V_  "" ;
пижнетемс:пижнетемс V_  "" ;
прявтомс:прявтомс V_  "" ;
серьнемс:серьнемс V_  "" ;
сэнеиедевемс:сэнеиедевемс V_  "" ;
тыжнезевемс:тыжнезевемс V_  "" ;
утякснемс:утякснемс V_  "" ;
циьнемс:циьнемс V_  "" ;
эзнэстэ% лисемс:эзнэстэ% лисемс V_  "" ;
айгемс:айг TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "siirtää, liikuttaa; lykätä, siirtää" ;
басявтомс:басявт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
борцадемс:борцадь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
важдемс:важде TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
важодевтемс:важодевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
валгомс:валг TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "laskeutua, laskea" ;
валновтомс:валновт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
верьгедемс:верьгедь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "sytyttää" ;
ветявтовтомс:ветявтовт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
вечкемс:вечк TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "rakastaa, pitää; kunnioittaa" ;
витевтемс:витевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
дренькадемс:дренькадь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
жарявтомс:жарявт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
жикадевтемс:жикадевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ивардомс:ивард TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
изэрдемс:изэрдь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "raapia, kynsiä" ;
калготкстомомс:калготкстом TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "kovettua" ;
калмавтомс:калмавт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
кальцякадемс:кальцякадь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
кантневтемс:кантневть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
кемемс:кем TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "uskoa, luottaa" ;
кивензавтомс:кивензавт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
кикердевтемс:кикердевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
кокадемс:кокадь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "napauttaa, kopauttaa" ;
кочксевтемс:кочксевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ламокставтомс:ламокставт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
летькедевтемс:летькедевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
ливемс:лив TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
лыйкадемс:лыйкадь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "heilauttaa" ;
майсевтемс:майсевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
наксавтомс:наксавт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "mädättää" ;
нежедевтемс:нежедевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
нилемс:ниль TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "niellä, nielaista, нилензамс nelinkertaistaa" ;
ноцордомс:ноцорд TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
паролгавтомс:паролгавт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
певтемс:певть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
плестядемс:плестядь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "läimäyttää, läiskäyttää (piiskalla)" ;
повомс:пов TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
разнялгавтомс:разнялгавт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
риштневтемс:риштневть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
сеземс:сезь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "repiä, katkaista, ottaa, riuhtaista; (murt.) ylittää, mennä yli, kulkea yli; (murt.) poistua, loitota, mennä pois. сеземс умарь ottaa omena (puusta), cype сеземс katkaista lanka. конёвонть сеземс кавтов repiä paperi kahtia" ;
содомс:сод TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "sitoa, köyttää, ripustaa" ;
сэлявтомс:сэлявт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
сялдомс:сялд TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
тутмадевтемс:тутмадевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
увновтомс:увновт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
урадомс:урад TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "vyyhtiä, kelata, keriä" ;
хропадемс:хропадь TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
човордавтомс:човордавт TV_САВТОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
шешкевтемс:шешкевть TV_НЕВТЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
шождыньгадомс:шождыньгад TV_КАДОМС-ObjAll  "" ;
эшкенемс:эшкень TV_ЛЕДЕМС-ObjAll  "" ;
